Nebraska, session 109, LB1125.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1125 LB1125
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 85-422, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
85-422 (1) In order to accomplish any projects authorized by section
85-421, the Board of Regents of the University of Nebraska may enter into
contracts with any person, firm, or corporation providing for the
implementation of any such project of the University of Nebraska and
providing for the long-term payment of the cost of such project from the
University of Nebraska Facilities Program. In no case shall any such
contract extend for a period beyond December 31, 2063, nor shall any such
contract exceed the repayment capabilities implicit in the funding
streams authorized in sections 85-419 to 85-422.
(2) The Board of Regents of the University of Nebraska shall not
pledge the credit of the State of Nebraska for the payment of any sum
owing on account of such contract, except that there may be pledged for
the payment of any such contract any appropriation specifically made by
the Legislature for such purpose, together with such funds of the Board
of Regents of the University of Nebraska as the board determines. No
contract shall be entered into pursuant to this section without prior
approval by the Board of Regents. The Board of Regents may also convey,
lease, or lease back all or any part of the projects authorized by
section 85-421 and the land on which such projects are situated to such
person, firm, or corporation as the Board of Regents may contract with
pursuant to this section to facilitate the long-term payment of the cost
of such projects. Any such conveyance or lease shall provide that when
the cost of such projects has been paid, together with interest and other
costs thereon, such projects and the land on which such projects are
located shall become the property of the Board of Regents.
(3) The Board of Regents of the University of Nebraska is authorized
to make expenditures for the purposes stated in this section and section
85-421 from investment income balances in any fund created under the
authority provided for in any contract or contracts authorized by this
-2-

LB1125 LB1125
2026 2026
section. Any balance existing in the University of Nebraska Facilities
Program, whether from appropriations or the designated amounts identified
in section 85-419, in excess of amounts required to meet debt service and
any interest thereon for any related financing contract, and excluding
amounts on deposit in the trust fund established pursuant to subsection
(7) of section 85-421, shall be distributed proportionally between the
Board of Regents and the Department of Administrative Services as to the
total amount contributed to the program by the Board of Regents pursuant
to section 85-419 and by the state, beginning in the fiscal year
commencing July 1, 2009, through and including the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2062, on December 31, 2063, or when all financial obligations
incurred in the contracts entered into by the Board of Regents pursuant
to this section are discharged, whichever occurs first.
(4) Any contract by the University of Nebraska to acquire, directly
or indirectly and whether alone or when combined with other interests
already possessed, a controlling interest or sole interest in any
hospital or health care facility valued at over one hundred million
dollars shall be subject to prior approval by the Legislature and, if the
Legislature is not in session, the Executive Board of the Legislative
Council.
(5) No hospital or academic health center which serves as the
primary affiliate of one or more of the colleges of the University of
Nebraska Medical Center may be owned or controlled, directly or
indirectly, in whole or in part, by a for-profit entity or an out-of-
state entity unless the Attorney General determines that ownership or
control by a for-profit entity or an out-of-state entity is in the public
interest. Any determination under this section must be made in
consultation with the Board of Regents of the University of Nebraska.
Sec. 2. Original section 85-422, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, is repealed.
Sec. 3. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when
-3-

LB1125 LB1125
2026 2026
passed and approved according to law.
-4-